Utah statutes.
72-10-504.   Admissibility of chemical test results in actions for flying under the influence -- Weight of evidence.

(1) (a)  In any civil or criminal action or proceeding in which it is material to prove that a person was operating or in actual physical control of an aircraft while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or with a blood or breath alcohol content statutorily prohibited, the results of a chemical test or tests as authorized in Section 72-10-502 are admissible as evidence.

(b) (i)  In a criminal proceeding, noncompliance with Section 72-10-502 does not render the results of the chemical test inadmissible.

(ii)  Evidence of a defendant's blood or breath alcohol content or drug content is admissible except when prohibited by Rules of Evidence or the constitution.

(2)  This section does not prevent a court from receiving otherwise admissible evidence as to a defendant's blood or breath alcohol level or drug level at the time relevant to the alleged offense.



Amended by Chapter 106, 2002 General Session

